en: Skin Cleansing Brushes & Systems
xx: Skin Cleansing Brushes & Systems
cs: Čističe pleti
da: Børster og systemer til rensning af huden
de: Gesichtsbürsten
es: Cepillos y sistemas de limpieza de la piel
fr: Systèmes et brosses pour nettoyer la peau
it: Spazzole e sistemi di pulizia della pelle
ja: 洗顔ブラシ
nl: Huidreinigingsborstels en -systemen
no: Børster og systemer for hudrens
pl: Szczotki i zestawy do oczyszczania twarzy
pt: Sistemas e pincéis de limpeza de pele
ru: Щётки и системы для очистки кожи
sv: Borstar och system för hudrengöring
tr: Cilt Temizleme Fırça ve Sistemleri

en: Makeup
xx: Makeup
cs: Make-up
da: Makeup
de: Make-up
es: Maquillaje
fr: Maquillage
it: Trucco
ja: メイクアップ
nl: Make-up
no: Sminke
pl: Makijaż
pt: Maquiagem
ru: Макияж
sv: Makeup
tr: Makyaj

en: Body Makeup
xx: Body Makeup
cs: Tělový make-up
da: Kropsmakeup
de: Körper-Make-up
es: Maquillaje corporal
fr: Maquillage pour le corps
it: Trucco per il corpo
ja: ボディメイク
nl: Lichaamsmake-up
no: Kropssminke
pl: Makijaż ciała
pt: Maquiagem corporal
ru: Косметика для тела
sv: Kroppsmakeup
tr: Vücut Makyajı

en: Body & Hair Glitter
xx: Body & Hair Glitter
cs: Třpytky na tělo a vlasy
da: Glimmer til krop og hår
de: Glitter für Körper und Haar
es: Purpurina para cuerpo y cabello
fr: Paillettes pour le corps et les cheveux
it: Glitter corpo e capelli
ja: 髪・体用グリッター
nl: Lichaams- en haarglitter
no: Kropps- og hårglitter
pl: Kosmetyki rozświetlające do włosów i ciała
pt: Glitter para o corpo e cabelo
ru: Блестки для тела и волос
sv: Kropps- och hårglitter
tr: Vücut ve Saç Parlatıcı

en: Body Paint & Foundation
xx: Body Paint & Foundation
cs: Tělové barvy a podkladové báze
da: Kropsmaling og foundation
de: Bodypainting-Farbe
es: Base y pintura corporal
fr: Décoration du corps
it: Colori per body painting e fondotinta
ja: ボディペイント・ボディファンデーション
nl: Lichaamsverf en -foundation
no: Kroppsmaling og foundation
pl: Farby i podkłady do ciała
pt: Bases e tintas corporais
ru: Краска для тела
sv: Kroppsmålning och foundation
tr: Vücut Boya ve Fondöteni

en: Costume & Stage Makeup
xx: Costume & Stage Makeup
cs: Kostýmový a divadelní make-up
da: Kostume og scenemakeup
de: Kostüm- & Bühnen-Make-up
es: Maquillaje teatral y artístico
fr: Costumes et maquillage de scène
it: Costumi e trucco teatrale
ja: 仮装メイク・舞台メイク
nl: Toneelmake-up
no: Kostyme- og scenesminke
pl: Charakteryzacja i makijaż sceniczny
pt: Maquiagem para fantasia e teatro
ru: Маскарадный и сценический макияж
sv: Kostym- och scenmakeup
tr: Kostüm ve Sahne Makyajı

en: Eye Makeup
xx: Eye Makeup
cs: Oční make-up
da: Øjenmakeup
de: Augen
es: Maquillaje para ojos
fr: Maquillage pour les yeux
it: Trucco degli occhi
ja: アイメイク
nl: Oogmake-up
no: Øyesminke
pl: Makijaż oka
pt: Maquiagem para os olhos
ru: Косметика для глаз
sv: Ögonmakeup
tr: Göz Makyajı

en: Eye Primer
xx: Eye Primer
cs: Podkladové přípravky na oční víčka
da: Øjenskyggeprimer
de: Lidschatten-Grundierung
es: Base fijadora para sombra de ojos
fr: Base de maquillage pour les yeux
it: Primer per ombretto
ja: アイシャドウベース
nl: Oogschaduwprimer
no: Primer for øyelokk
pl: Bazy pod cienie do powiek
pt: Primer para olhos
ru: Основа под тени для век
sv: Primer för ögonskugga
tr: Göz Farı Astarı

en: Eye Shadow
xx: Eye Shadow
cs: Oční stíny
da: Øjenskygge
de: Lidschatten
es: Sombra de ojos
fr: Fard à paupières
it: Ombretto
ja: アイシャドウ
nl: Oogschaduw
no: Øyenskygge
pl: Cienie do powiek
pt: Sombras
ru: Тени для век
sv: Ögonskugga
tr: Göz Farı

en: Eyebrow Enhancers
xx: Eyebrow Enhancers
cs: Tužky na obočí
da: Forlængere til øjenbryn
de: Augenbrauen Make-up
es: Lápices para cejas
fr: Crayons sourcils
it: Matite per sopracciglia
ja: アイブロウ
nl: Wenkbrauwpotloden
no: Øyebrynforsterkere
pl: Kredki do brwi
pt: Lápis para sobrancelhas
ru: Карандаши для бровей
sv: Ögonbrynsförbättrare
tr: Kaş Dolgunlaştırıcılar

en: Eyeliner
xx: Eyeliner
cs: Oční linky
da: Eyeliner
de: Eyeliner & Kajal
es: Perfiladores de ojos
fr: Eye-liner
it: Eyeliner
ja: アイライナー
nl: Eyeliner
no: Eyeliner
pl: Eyelinery
pt: Delineador para olhos
ru: Карандаши для подводки век
sv: Eyeliner
tr: Eyeliner

en: False Eyelashes
xx: False Eyelashes
cs: Umělé řasy
da: Falske øjenvipper
de: Künstliche Wimpern
es: Pestañas postizas
fr: Faux-cils
it: Ciglia finte
ja: つけまつ毛
nl: Valse wimpers
no: Falske øyevipper
pl: Sztuczne rzęsy
pt: Cílios postiços
ru: Накладные ресницы
sv: Lösögonfransar
tr: Takma Kirpikler

en: Lash & Brow Growth Treatments
xx: Lash & Brow Growth Treatments
cs: Přípravky pro růst řas a obočí
da: Vækstbehandlinger til øjenvipper og -bryn
de: Wimpern- & Augenbrauenbehandlung
es: Tratamientos para crecimiento de pestañas y cejas
fr: Traitements pour la croissance des cils et des sourcils
it: Trattamenti per la crescita di ciglia e sopracciglia
ja: まつ毛・眉毛用トリートメント
nl: Middelen voor wimper- en wenkbrauwgroei
no: Vekstbehandlinger for øyevipper og øyebryn
pl: Odżywki do rzęs i brwi
pt: Tratamentos para crescimento dos cílios e das sobrancelhas
ru: Средства для роста ресниц и бровей
sv: Tillväxtbehandlingar för ögonfransar och ögonbryn
tr: Kirpik ve Kaş Uzatıcı Tedaviler

en: Mascara
xx: Mascara
cs: Řasenky
da: Mascara
de: Mascara
es: Rímel
fr: Mascara
it: Mascara
ja: マスカラ
nl: Mascara
no: Mascara
pl: Tusze do rzęs
pt: Rímel
ru: Тушь
sv: Mascara
tr: Maskara

en: Mascara Primer
xx: Mascara Primer
cs: Podkladové báze na řasy
da: Mascaraprimer
de: Mascara-Grundierung
es: Base fijadora de máscara
fr: Apprêts pour cils
it: Primer per mascara
ja: マスカラ下地
nl: Mascaraprimer
no: Mascaraprimer
pl: Bazy pod tusz do rzęs
pt: Primers de máscara para cílios
ru: Основа для туши для ресниц
sv: Mascaraprimer
tr: Maskara Astarı

en: Face Makeup
xx: Face Makeup
cs: Make-up na obličej a tváře
da: Ansigtsmakeup
de: Teint
es: Maquillaje para cara y mejillas
fr: Maquillage du visage
it: Trucco viso e guance
ja: フェイスメイク
nl: Gezichtsmake-up
no: Ansiktssminke
pl: Makijaż twarzy
pt: Maquiagem para o rosto
ru: Косметика для лица
sv: Ansiktsmakeup
tr: Yüz Makyajı

en: Blushes & Bronzers
xx: Blushes & Bronzers
cs: Tvářenky a bronzery
da: Rouge og bronzere
de: Rouge & Bronzepuder
es: Coloretes y polvos bronceadores
fr: Fards à joues
it: Blush e terre
ja: チーク・ブロンザー
nl: Blush en bronzers
no: Rouge og kunstig brunfarge
pl: Róże i bronzery
pt: Blushes e bronzers
ru: Румяна и бронзанты
sv: Puderrouge och bronzers
tr: Allıklar ve Bronzlaştırıcılar

en: Face Powder
xx: Face Powder
cs: Pudry
da: Ansigtspudder
de: Puder
es: Polvos
fr: Poudres pour visage
it: Ciprie
ja: フェイスパウダー
nl: Poeders
no: Ansiktspudder
pl: Pudry do twarzy
pt: Pó facial
ru: Пудры
sv: Ansiktspuder
tr: Yüz Pudrası

en: Face Primer
xx: Face Primer
cs: Podkladové báze na tvář
da: Ansigtsprimer
de: Gesichtsgrundierung
es: Base fijadora de maquillaje
fr: Base de maquillage pour le visage
it: Primer per il viso
ja: 化粧下地
nl: Gezichtsprimer
no: Ansiktsprimer
pl: Bazy pod makijaż
pt: Primers faciais
ru: Основа под макияж
sv: Ansiktsprimer
tr: Yüz Astarı

en: Foundations & Concealers
xx: Foundations & Concealers
cs: Podkladové make-upy a korektory
da: Foundation og concealere
de: Grundierungen & Concealer
es: Bases de maquillaje y correctores
fr: Fonds de teint et correcteurs de teint
it: Fondotinta e correttori
ja: ファンデーション・コンシーラー
nl: Foundations en concealers
no: Foundation og dekkremer
pl: Podkłady i korektory
pt: Bases e corretivos
ru: Крема-основы и тональные крема
sv: Foundations och concealers
tr: Fondötenler ve Kapatıcılar